Illinois, session 104th, HB1307.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 7-109.3, 7-142.1, 7-150, and 7-156 as 6follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/7-109.3)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-109.3)8    Sec. 7-109.3. "Sheriff's Law Enforcement Employees". 9    (a) "Sheriff's law enforcement employee" or "SLEP" means:10        (1) A county sheriff and all deputies, other than 11    special deputies, employed on a full time basis in the 12    office of the sheriff.13        (2) A person who has elected to participate in this 14    Fund under Section 3-109.1 of this Code, and who is 15    employed by a participating municipality to perform police 16    duties.17        (3) A law enforcement officer employed on a full time 18    basis by a Forest Preserve District, provided that such 19    officer shall be deemed a "sheriff's law enforcement 20    employee" for the purposes of this Article, and service in 21    that capacity shall be deemed to be service as a sheriff's 22    law enforcement employee, only if the board of 23    commissioners of the District have so elected by adoption   HB1307- 2 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1    of an affirmative resolution. Such election, once made, 2    may not be rescinded.3        (4) A person not eligible to participate in a fund 4    established under Article 3 of this Code who is employed 5    on a full-time basis by a participating municipality or 6    participating instrumentality to perform police duties at 7    an airport, but only if the governing authority of the 8    employer has approved sheriff's law enforcement employee 9    status for its airport police employees by adoption of an 10    affirmative resolution. Such approval, once given, may not 11    be rescinded.12        (5) A person first hired on or after January 1, 2011 13    who (i) is employed by a participating municipality that 14    has both 30 or more full-time police officers and 50 or 15    more full-time firefighters and has not established a fund 16    under Article 3 or Article 4 of this Code and (ii) is 17    employed on a full-time basis by that participating 18    municipality to perform police duties or firefighting and 19    EMS duties; but only if the governing authority of that 20    municipality has approved sheriff's law enforcement 21    employee status for its police officer or firefighter 22    employees by adoption of an affirmative resolution. The 23    resolution must specify that SLEP status shall be 24    applicable to such employment occurring on or after the 25    adoption of the resolution. Such resolution shall be 26    irrevocable, but shall automatically terminate upon the   HB1307- 3 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1    establishment of an Article 3 or 4 fund by the 2    municipality. 3        (6) Any full-time firefighter or firefighter/paramedic 4    employed by a city, village, incorporated town, or 5    township that has a population of less than 5,000 6    inhabitants, is located in a county of more than 1,000,000 7    inhabitants, and employs 40 or more full-time paid 8    firefighters or firefighter/paramedics who are subject to 9    a collective bargaining agreement, provided that such a 10    person is not eligible to participate in a fund 11    established under Article 4 of this Code. 12    (b) An employee who is a sheriff's law enforcement 13employee and is granted military leave or authorized leave of 14absence shall receive service credit in that capacity. 15Sheriff's law enforcement employees shall not be entitled to 16out-of-State service credit under Section 7-139.17(Source: P.A. 100-354, eff. 8-25-17; 100-1097, eff. 8-26-18.) 18    (40 ILCS 5/7-142.1)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-142.1)19    Sec. 7-142.1. Sheriff's law enforcement employees. 20    (a) In lieu of the retirement annuity provided by 21subparagraph 1 of paragraph (a) of Section 7-142: 22    Any sheriff's law enforcement employee who has 20 or more 23years of service in that capacity and who terminates service 24prior to January 1, 1988 shall be entitled at his option to 25receive a monthly retirement annuity for his service as a   HB1307- 4 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1sheriff's law enforcement employee computed by multiplying 2% 2for each year of such service up to 10 years, 2 1/4% for each 3year of such service above 10 years and up to 20 years, and 2 41/2% for each year of such service above 20 years, by his 5annual final rate of earnings and dividing by 12. 6    Any sheriff's law enforcement employee who has 20 or more 7years of service in that capacity and who terminates service 8on or after January 1, 1988 and before July 1, 2004 shall be 9entitled at his option to receive a monthly retirement annuity 10for his service as a sheriff's law enforcement employee 11computed by multiplying 2.5% for each year of such service up 12to 20 years, 2% for each year of such service above 20 years 13and up to 30 years, and 1% for each year of such service above 1430 years, by his annual final rate of earnings and dividing by 1512. 16    Any sheriff's law enforcement employee who has 20 or more 17years of service in that capacity and who terminates service 18on or after July 1, 2004 shall be entitled at his or her option 19to receive a monthly retirement annuity for service as a 20sheriff's law enforcement employee computed by multiplying 212.5% for each year of such service by his annual final rate of 22earnings and dividing by 12. 23    If a sheriff's law enforcement employee has service in any 24other capacity, his retirement annuity for service as a 25sheriff's law enforcement employee may be computed under this 26Section and the retirement annuity for his other service under   HB1307- 5 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1Section 7-142. 2    In no case shall the total monthly retirement annuity for 3persons who retire before July 1, 2004 exceed 75% of the 4monthly final rate of earnings. In no case shall the total 5monthly retirement annuity for persons who retire on or after 6July 1, 2004 exceed 80% of the monthly final rate of earnings. 7    (b) Whenever continued group insurance coverage is elected 8in accordance with the provisions of Section 367h of the 9Illinois Insurance Code, as now or hereafter amended, the 10total monthly premium for such continued group insurance 11coverage or such portion thereof as is not paid by the 12municipality shall, upon request of the person electing such 13continued group insurance coverage, be deducted from any 14monthly pension benefit otherwise payable to such person 15pursuant to this Section, to be remitted by the Fund to the 16insurance company or other entity providing the group 17insurance coverage. 18    (c) A sheriff's law enforcement employee who began service 19in that capacity prior to the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly and who has 21service in any other capacity may convert up to 10 years of 22that service into service as a sheriff's law enforcement 23employee by paying to the Fund an amount equal to (1) the 24additional employee contribution required under Section 257-173.1, plus (2) the additional employer contribution 26required under Section 7-172, plus (3) interest on items (1)   HB1307- 6 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1and (2) at the prescribed rate from the date of the service to 2the date of payment. Application must be received by the Board 3while the employee is an active participant in the Fund. 4Payment must be received while the member is an active 5participant, except that one payment will be permitted after 6termination of participation. 7    (d) The changes to subsections (a) and (b) of this Section 8made by this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly apply 9only to persons in service on or after July 1, 2004. In the 10case of such a person who begins to receive a retirement 11annuity before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 12the 94th General Assembly, the annuity shall be recalculated 13prospectively to reflect those changes, with the resulting 14increase beginning to accrue on the first annuity payment date 15following the effective date of this amendatory Act. 16    (e) Any elected county officer who was entitled to receive 17a stipend from the State on or after July 1, 2009 and on or 18before June 30, 2010 may establish earnings credit for the 19amount of stipend not received, if the elected county official 20applies in writing to the fund within 6 months after the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 22Assembly and pays to the fund an amount equal to (i) employee 23contributions on the amount of stipend not received, (ii) 24employer contributions determined by the Board equal to the 25employer's normal cost of the benefit on the amount of stipend 26not received, plus (iii) interest on items (i) and (ii) at the   HB1307- 7 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1actuarially assumed rate. 2    (f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 3the provisions of this subsection (f) apply to a person who 4first becomes a sheriff's law enforcement employee under this 5Article on or after January 1, 2011, except any person 6employed as a firefighter or firefighter/paramedic before 7January 1, 2011, who, after that date, first becomes a 8sheriff's law enforcement employee under this Article by 9operation of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of Section 107-109.3.11    A sheriff's law enforcement employee age 55 or more who 12has 10 or more years of service in that capacity shall be 13entitled at his option to receive a monthly retirement annuity 14for his or her service as a sheriff's law enforcement employee 15computed by multiplying 2.5% for each year of such service by 16his or her final rate of earnings.17    The retirement annuity of a sheriff's law enforcement 18employee who is retiring after attaining age 50 with 10 or more 19years of creditable service shall be reduced by one-half of 1% 20for each month that the sheriff's law enforcement employee's 21age is under age 55.22    The maximum retirement annuity under this subsection (f) 23shall be 75% of final rate of earnings.24    For the purposes of this subsection (f), "final rate of 25earnings" means the average monthly earnings obtained by 26dividing the total salary of the sheriff's law enforcement   HB1307- 8 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1employee during the 96 consecutive months of service within 2the last 120 months of service in which the total earnings was 3the highest by the number of months of service in that period. 4    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 5beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under this Code 6(including without limitation the calculation of benefits and 7employee contributions), except with regard to any person 8employed as a firefighter or firefighter/paramedic before 9January 1, 2011, who, after that date, first becomes a 10sheriff's law enforcement employee under this Article by 11operation of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of Section 127-109.3, the annual earnings of a sheriff's law enforcement 13employee to whom this Section applies shall not include 14overtime and shall not exceed $106,800; however, that amount 15shall annually thereafter be increased by the lesser of (i) 3% 16of that amount, including all previous adjustments, or (ii) 17one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 18less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 19ending with the September preceding each November 1, including 20all previous adjustments. 21    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 22the monthly annuity of a person who first becomes a sheriff's 23law enforcement employee under this Article on or after 24January 1, 2011, except any person employed as a firefighter 25or firefighter/paramedic before January 1, 2011, who, after 26that date, first becomes a sheriff's law enforcement employee   HB1307- 9 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1under this Article by operation of paragraph (6) of subsection 2(a) of Section 7-109.3, shall be increased on the January 1 3occurring either on or after the attainment of age 60 or the 4first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever is 5later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 6one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 7less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 8ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 9is less, of the originally granted retirement annuity. If the 10annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 11index-u for a 12-month period ending in September is zero or, 12when compared with the preceding period, decreases, then the 13annuity shall not be increased. 14    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 15for a person who first becomes a sheriff's law enforcement 16employee under this Article on or after January 1, 2011, 17except any person employed as a firefighter or 18firefighter/paramedic before January 1, 2011, who, after that 19date, first becomes a sheriff's law enforcement employee under 20this Article by operation of paragraph (6) of subsection (a) 21of Section 7-109.3, the annuity to which the surviving spouse, 22children, or parents are entitled under this subsection (h) 23shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the sheriff's law 24enforcement employee's earned annuity at the date of death.25    (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 26the monthly annuity of a survivor of a person who first becomes   HB1307- 10 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1a sheriff's law enforcement employee under this Article on or 2after January 1, 2011, except any person employed as a 3firefighter or firefighter/paramedic before January 1, 2011, 4who, after that date, first becomes a sheriff's law 5enforcement employee under this Article by operation of 6paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of Section 7-109.3, shall be 7increased on the January 1 after attainment of age 60 by the 8recipient of the survivor's annuity and each January 1 9thereafter by 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 10increase in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 11ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 12is less, of the originally granted pension. If the annual 13unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price index-u for 14a 12-month period ending in September is zero or, when 15compared with the preceding period, decreases, then the 16annuity shall not be increased. 17    (j) For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price 18index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 19Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 20measures the average change in prices of goods and services 21purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 22all items, 1982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each 23annual adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension 24Division of the Department of Insurance and made available to 25the boards of the pension funds. 26(Source: P.A. 100-148, eff. 8-18-17.)   HB1307- 11 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1    (40 ILCS 5/7-150)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-150)2    Sec. 7-150. Total and permanent disability benefits - 3Eligibility. Total and permanent disability benefits shall be 4payable to participating employees as hereinafter provided, 5including those employees receiving disability benefit on July 61, 1962.7    (a) A participating employee shall be considered totally 8and permanently disabled if:9        1. He is unable to engage in any gainful activity 10    because of any medically determinable physical or mental 11    impairment which can be expected to result in death or be 12    of a long continued and indefinite duration, other than as 13    a result of self-inflicted injury or addiction to narcotic 14    drugs;15        2. The Board has received a written certification by 16    at least 1 licensed and practicing physician stating that 17    the employee meets the qualifications of subparagraph 1 of 18    this paragraph (a).19    (b) A totally and permanently disabled employee is 20entitled to a permanent disability benefit provided:21        1. He has exhausted his temporary disability benefits.22        2. He:23            (i) has at least one year of service immediately 24        preceding the date the disability was incurred and has 25        made contributions to the fund for at least the number   HB1307- 12 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1        of months of service normally required in his position 2        during a 12 month period, or has at least 5 years of 3        service credit, the last year of which immediately 4        preceded the date the disability was incurred; or5            (ii) had qualified under clause (i) above, but had 6        an interruption in service of not more than 3 months in 7        the 12 months preceding the date the temporary 8        disability was incurred and was not paid a separation 9        benefit; or10            (iii) had qualified under clause (i) above, but 11        had an interruption after 20 or more years of 12        creditable service, was not paid a separation benefit, 13        and returned to service prior to the date the 14        disability was incurred.15        Item (iii) of this subdivision shall apply to all 16    employees whose disabilities were incurred on or after 17    July 1, 1985, and any such employee who becomes eligible 18    for a disability benefit under item (iii) shall be 19    entitled to receive a lump sum payment of any accumulated 20    disability benefits which may accrue from the date the 21    disability was incurred until the effective date of this 22    amendatory Act of 1987.23        Periods of qualified leave granted in compliance with 24    the federal Family and Medical Leave Act shall be ignored 25    for purposes of determining the number of consecutive 26    months of employment under this subdivision (b)2.  HB1307- 13 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1        3. He is receiving no earnings from a participating 2    municipality or instrumentality thereof or participating 3    instrumentality, except as allowed under subsection (f) of 4    Section 7-152.5        4. He has not refused to submit to a reasonable 6    physical examination by a physician appointed by the 7    Board.8        5. His disability is not the result of a mental or 9    physical condition which existed on the earliest date of 10    service from which he has uninterrupted service, including 11    prior service, at the date of his disability, provided 12    that this limitation shall not be applicable to a 13    participating employee who, without receiving a disability 14    benefit, receives 5 years of creditable service.15        6. He is not separated from the service of his 16    employing participating municipality or instrumentality 17    thereof or participating instrumentality on the date his 18    temporary disability was incurred; for the purposes of 19    payment of total and permanent disability benefits, a 20    participating employee, whose employment relationship is 21    terminated by his employing municipality, shall be deemed 22    not to be separated from the service of his employing 23    municipality or participating instrumentality if he 24    continues disabled by the same condition and so long as he 25    is otherwise entitled to such disability benefit.26        7. He has not refused to apply for a disability   HB1307- 14 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1    benefit under the Federal Social Security Act at the 2    request of the Board.3        8. He has not failed or refused to consent to and sign 4    an authorization allowing the Board to receive copies of 5    or to examine his medical and hospital records. 6        9. He has not failed or refused to provide complete 7    information regarding any other employment for 8    compensation he has received since becoming disabled. 9    (c) A participating employee shall remain eligible and may 10make application for a total and permanent disability benefit 11within 90 days after the termination of his temporary 12disability benefits or within such longer period terminating 13at the end of the period during which his employing 14municipality is prevented from employing him by reason of any 15statutory prohibition.16    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, a 17firefighter or firefighter/paramedic who participates under 18this Article, has 5 or more years of creditable service, and is 19found unable to perform his or her duties in the fire 20department by reason of heart disease, stroke, tuberculosis, 21or any disease of the lungs or respiratory tract, resulting 22from service as a firefighter, is entitled to an occupational 23disease disability pension during any period of such 24disability for which he or she has no right to receive salary.25    Any active firefighter or firefighter/paramedic who 26participates under this Article, has completed 5 or more years   HB1307- 15 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1of service, and is unable to perform his or her duties in the 2fire department by reason of a disabling cancer, which 3develops or manifests itself during a period while the 4firefighter or firefighter/paramedic is in the service of the 5fire department, shall be entitled to receive an occupational 6disease disability benefit during any period of such 7disability for which he or she does not have a right to receive 8salary. In order to receive this occupational disease 9disability benefit, (i) the type of cancer involved must be a 10type that may be caused by exposure to heat, radiation, or a 11known carcinogen, as defined by the International Agency for 12Research on Cancer, and (ii) the cancer must (and is 13rebuttably presumed to) arise as a result of service as a 14firefighter.15    A firefighter or firefighter/paramedic who participates 16under this Article and who enters the service after August 27, 171971 shall be examined by one or more practicing physicians 18appointed by the Board. If the examination discloses 19impairment of the heart, lungs, or respiratory tract, or the 20existence of any cancer, the firefighter or 21firefighter/paramedic who participates under this Article 22shall not be entitled to the occupational disease disability 23pension unless and until a subsequent examination reveals no 24such impairment or cancer.25    The occupational disease disability pension shall be equal 26to the greater of (1) 65% of the salary attached to the rank   HB1307- 16 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1held by the firefighter in the fire service at the time of his 2or her removal from the municipality's fire department payroll 3or (2) the retirement pension that the firefighter or 4firefighter/paramedic would be eligible to receive if he or 5she retired (but not including any automatic annual increase 6in that retirement pension).7    The firefighter or firefighter/paramedic who participates 8under this Article is also entitled to a child's disability 9benefit of $20 a month for each natural or legally adopted 10unmarried child less than age 18 who is dependent upon the 11firefighter or firefighter/paramedic for support. The total 12child's disability benefit when added to the occupational 13disease disability pension shall not exceed 75% of the 14firefighter's or firefighter/paramedic's salary at the time of 15the grant of occupational disease disability pension.16    The occupational disease disability pension is payable to 17the firefighter or firefighter/paramedic during the period of 18the disability. If the disability ceases before the death of 19the firefighter or firefighter/paramedic, the disability 20pension payable under this Section shall also cease, and the 21firefighter or firefighter/paramedic thereafter shall receive 22such pension benefits as are provided in accordance with other 23provisions of this Article.24    If a firefighter or firefighter/paramedic who participates 25under this Article dies while still disabled and receiving a 26disability pension under this Section, the disability pension   HB1307- 17 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1shall continue to be paid to the firefighter's or 2firefighter/paramedic's survivors. A pension previously 3granted under this Section to a firefighter or 4firefighter/paramedic who died while receiving a disability 5pension under this Section shall be deemed to be a 6continuation of the pension provided under this Section and 7shall be deemed to be in the nature of worker's occupational 8disease compensation payments. The changes to this Section 9made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are 10intended to be retroactive and are not limited to persons in 11service on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 104th General Assembly.13    The child's disability benefit shall terminate if the 14disability ceases while the firefighter or 15firefighter/paramedic is alive or when the child or children 16attain age 18 or marry, whichever event occurs first, except 17that benefits payable on account of a child under this Section 18shall not be reduced or terminated by reason of the child's 19attainment of age 18 if he or she is then dependent by reason 20of a physical or mental disability but shall continue to be 21paid as long as such dependency continues. Individuals over 22the age of 18 and adjudged as a disabled person pursuant to 23Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975, except for persons 24receiving benefits under Article III of the Illinois Public 25Aid Code, shall be eligible to receive benefits under this 26Act.   HB1307- 18 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1(Source: P.A. 101-151, eff. 7-26-19.) 2    (40 ILCS 5/7-156)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-156)3    Sec. 7-156. Surviving spouse annuities - amount. 4    (a) The amount of surviving spouse annuity shall be: 5    1. Upon the death of an employee annuitant or such person 6entitled, upon application, to a retirement annuity at date of 7death, (i) an amount equal to 50% for a Tier 1 regular employee 8or 66 2/3% for a Tier 2 regular employee of the retirement 9annuity which was or would have been payable exclusive of the 10amount so payable which was provided from additional credits, 11and disregarding any election made under paragraph (b) of 12Section 7-142, plus (ii) an annuity which could be provided at 13the then attained age of the surviving spouse and under 14actuarial tables then in effect, from the excess of the 15additional credits, (excluding any such credits used to create 16a reversionary annuity) used to provide the annuity granted 17pursuant to paragraph (a) (2) of Section 7-142 of this article 18over the total annuity payments made pursuant thereto. 19    2. Upon the death of a participating employee on or after 20attainment of age 55, an amount equal to 50% for a Tier 1 21regular employee or 66 2/3% for a Tier 2 regular employee of 22the retirement annuity which he could have had as of the date 23of death had he then retired and applied for annuity, 24exclusive of the portion thereof which could have been 25provided from additional credits, and disregarding paragraph   HB1307- 19 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1(b) of Section 7-142, plus an amount equal to the annuity which 2could be provided from the total of his accumulated additional 3credits at date of death, on the basis of the attained age of 4the surviving spouse on such date. 5    3. Upon the death of a participating employee before age 655, an amount equal to 50% for a Tier 1 regular employee or 66 72/3% for a Tier 2 regular employee of the retirement annuity 8which he could have had as of his attained age on the date of 9death, had he then retired and applied for annuity, and the 10provisions of this Article that no such annuity shall begin 11until the employee has attained at least age 55 were not 12applicable, exclusive of the portion thereof which could have 13been provided from additional credits and disregarding 14paragraph (b) of Section 7-142, plus an amount equal to the 15annuity which could be provided from the total of his 16accumulated additional credits at date of death, on the basis 17of the attained age of the surviving spouse on such date. 18    In the case of the surviving spouse of a person who dies 19before June 1, 2006 (the effective date of Public Act 94-712), 20if the surviving spouse is more than 5 years younger than the 21deceased, that portion of the annuity which is not based on 22additional credits shall be reduced in the ratio of the value 23of a life annuity of $1 per year at an age of 5 years less than 24the attained age of the deceased, at the earlier of the date of 25the death or the date his retirement annuity begins, to the 26value of a life annuity of $1 per year at the attained age of   HB1307- 20 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1the surviving spouse on such date, according to actuarial 2tables approved by the Board. This reduction does not apply to 3the surviving spouse of a person who dies on or after June 1, 42006 (the effective date of Public Act 94-712). 5    In computing the amount of a surviving spouse annuity, 6incremental increases of retirement annuities to the date of 7death of the employee annuitant shall be considered. 8    (b) If the employee was a Tier 1 regular employee, each 9surviving spouse annuity payable on January 1, 1988 shall be 10increased on that date by 3% of the original amount of the 11annuity. Each surviving spouse annuity that begins after 12January 1, 1988 shall be increased on the January 1 next 13occurring after the annuity begins, by an amount equal to (i) 143% of the original amount thereof if the deceased employee was 15receiving a retirement annuity at the time of his death; 16otherwise (ii) 0.25% of the original amount thereof for each 17complete month which has elapsed since the date the annuity 18began. 19    On each January 1 after the date of the initial increase 20under this subsection, each surviving spouse annuity shall be 21increased by 3% of the originally granted amount of the 22annuity. 23    (c) If the participating employee was a Tier 2 regular 24employee, each surviving spouse annuity shall be increased (1) 25on each January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 26annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a   HB1307- 21 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 2occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 3the annuity. Such annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 4one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 5less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 6ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 7is less, of the originally granted surviving spouse annuity. 8If the annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer 9price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 10preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then 11the annuity shall not be increased. 12    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 13the pension of the surviving spouse of a firefighter who 14qualifies as a sheriff's law enforcement employee under 15paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of Section 7-109.3 and dies on 16or after January 1, 1988 as a result of sickness, accident, or 17injury incurred in or resulting from the performance of an act 18of duty or from the cumulative effects of acts of duty shall 19not be less than 100% of the salary attached to the rank held 20by the deceased firefighter on the last day of service. 21(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 1-1-22.) 22    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 23Section 8.49 as follows: 24    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)  HB1307- 22 -LRB104 07406 RPS 17447 b1    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 28 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 3the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 4Act of the 104th General Assembly. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.